Idaho statutes. Title 59 PUBLIC OFFICERS IN GENERAL
Chapter 13 PUBLIC EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT SYSTEM
§ 59-1332. Pick up of employee contributions.

An employer, pursuant to the provisions of section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, shall pick up and pay the contributions which would be payable by the employees as members under sections 59-1331 and 72-1431, Idaho Code, with respect to the service of employees after June 30, 1983.

The members’ contributions picked up by an employer shall be designated for all purposes of the retirement system as member contributions, except for the determination of tax upon a distribution from the retirement system. These accumulated contributions shall become part of the members’ accumulated contributions, but accounted for separately from those previously accumulated.

Member contributions picked up by an employer shall be payable from the same source as is used to pay compensation to a member, and shall be included in the member’s salary as defined in subsection (31) of section 59-1302, Idaho Code.

§ 59-1332A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1332B. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1333. Contributions from employees.

The contribution for a member who is not classified as a police officer or firefighter shall be sixty percent (60%) of the employer contribution rate determined pursuant to section 59-1322, Idaho Code, and rounded to the nearest one hundredth percent (.01%) of salary; provided, however, that such member rate effective October 1, 1985, shall remain at five and thirty-four hundredths percent (5.34%) of salary until the first time after October 1, 1985, that the employer rate is changed from eight and eighty-nine hundredths percent (8.89%) of salary. The board is specifically authorized to certify to the state controller the necessary adjustments in the rate of member contributions.

§ 59-1334. Contributions — From policemen and firefighters.

The contribution for a member who is classified as a police officer or firefighter shall be seventy-two percent (72%) of the employer contribution rate determined pursuant to section 59-1322, Idaho Code, and rounded to the nearest one hundredth percent (.01%) of salary; provided, however, that such member rate effective October 1, 1985, shall remain at six and forty hundredths percent (6.40%) of salary until the first time after October 1, 1985, that the employer rate is changed from eight and eighty-nine hundredths percent (8.89%) of salary. The board is specifically authorized to certify to the state controller the necessary adjustments in the rate of member contributions.

§ 59-1335. Voluntary contributions. [Repealed.]

§ 59-1336. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1337. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1338. Conditions for contributions pursuant to which membership service retirement allowance may be granted certain school employees from July 1, 1965 to July 1, 1967. [Repealed.]

§ 59-1339. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1340. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1341. Conditions of eligibility for service retirement.

A vested member is eligible for service retirement as indicated below, based upon his service retirement ratio. A member’s service retirement ratio shall, at retirement, be equal to the ratio of (1) to (2) as follows:

The number of years of credited service for which the member was classified as a police officer or firefighter:

The member’s total number of years of credited service.

0.000 to 0.100

65

0.101 to 0.300

64

0.301 to 0.500

63

0.501 to 0.700

62

0.701 to 0.900

61

0.901 to 1.000

60

A person who was an active member on June 30, 1985 shall be deemed to have a service retirement ratio of 1.000 either if the member was a police officer or firefighter on that date and continuously thereafter to retirement or if at the time of retirement the majority of the member’s credited service has been that of a police officer or firefighter.

§ 59-1342. Computation of service retirement allowances — Minimum benefits.

The annual amount of accrued retirement allowance for each month of credited service for which a member was not classified as a police member or firefighter shall equal one and two-thirds percent (1 2/3%) of the member’s average monthly salary. Effective October 1, 1992, the annual amount of accrued retirement allowance for all service for which a member was not classified as a police member or firefighter shall equal one and seventy-five hundredths percent (1.75%) of the member’s average monthly salary; effective October 1, 1993, the annual amount of accrued retirement allowance shall equal one and eight hundred thirty-three thousandths percent (1.833%) of the member’s average monthly salary; effective October 1, 1994, the annual amount of accrued retirement allowance shall equal one and nine hundred seventeen thousandths percent (1.917%); and effective June 30, 2000, the annual amount of accrued retirement allowance shall equal two percent (2%) of the member’s average monthly salary. Entitlement to an annual amount of accrued retirement allowance shall not vest until the effective date of that annual amount of accrued retirement allowance. The retirement benefits shall be calculated on the amounts, terms and conditions in effect on the date of the final contribution by the member. The annual amount of initial service retirement allowance of such a member shall equal paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, whichever is greater:

The member’s accrued retirement allowance; or

Five dollars ($5.00) multiplied by the number of months of credited service and by the bridging factor, as provided in section 59-1355, Idaho Code, between July 1, 1974, and the first of the month following the member’s final contribution.

The annual amount of accrued retirement allowance for each month of credited service for which a member was classified as a police member or firefighter shall equal two percent (2%) of the member’s average monthly salary. Effective October 1, 1992, the annual amount of accrued retirement allowance for all service for which a member was classified as a police member or firefighter shall equal two and seventy-five thousandths percent (2.075%) of the member’s average monthly salary; effective October 1, 1993, the annual amount of accrued retirement allowance shall equal two and fifteen hundredths percent (2.15%) of the member’s average monthly salary; effective October 1, 1994, the annual amount of accrued retirement allowance shall equal two and two hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (2.225%); and effective June 30, 2000, the annual amount of accrued retirement allowance shall equal two and three-tenths percent (2.3%) of the member’s average monthly salary. Entitlement to an annual amount of accrued retirement allowance shall not vest until the effective date of that annual amount of accrued retirement allowance. The retirement benefits shall be calculated on the amounts, terms and conditions in effect on the date of the final contribution by the member. The annual amount of initial service retirement allowance of such a member shall equal paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, whichever is greater:
(a) The member’s accrued retirement allowance; or

The provisions of this section shall be applicable to members and contingent annuitants of the retirement system and to members, annuitants and beneficiaries of the teachers and city systems. In any recomputation of an initial retirement allowance for a person not making a final contribution subsequent to 1974, the bridging factor referred to in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be 1.000. Any recomputed retirement allowance shall be payable only prospectively from July 1, 1974.

Benefits payable to a person who became a member prior to July 1, 1974, or to the member’s beneficiaries shall never be less than they would have received under this chapter as in effect on June 30, 1974; provided, however, that the member shall have accrued the amount of accumulated contributions required thereby prior to payment of an initial retirement allowance.

If the majority of a member’s credited service is as an elected official or as an appointed official, including a member of the Idaho legislature who first took office after July 1, 2019, and that official was normally in the administrative offices of the employer less than twenty (20) hours per week during the term of office, or was normally not required to be present at any particular workstation for the employer twenty (20) hours per week or more during the term of office, that member’s initial service retirement allowance shall be the sum of:
(5)(a) If the majority of a member’s credited service is as an elected official or as an appointed official, including a member of the Idaho legislature who first took office after July 1, 2019, and that official was normally in the administrative offices of the employer less than twenty (20) hours per week during the term of office, or was normally not required to be present at any particular workstation for the employer twenty (20) hours per week or more during the term of office, that member’s initial service retirement allowance shall be the sum of:

That amount computed under subsection (1) and/or (2) of this section for only those months of service as an elected or an appointed official that are in excess of the months of other credited service, without consideration of any other credited service; and

That accrued service retirement allowance that is computed from an average monthly salary for salary received during the member’s total months of credited service excluding those excess months referenced in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.

The initial service retirement allowance of members of the Idaho legislature who first took office on or before July 1, 2019, will be computed under subsection (1) and/or (2) of this section, on the basis of their total months of credited service.

In no case, however, will a member’s initial service retirement benefit be equal to more than the member’s accrued benefit as of May 1, 1990, or one hundred percent (100%) of the member’s average compensation for the three (3) consecutive years of employment that produce the greatest aggregate compensation, whichever is greater. If the benefit is calculated to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the member’s average compensation, the member shall be eligible for and may choose either:

An annual service retirement allowance equal to the member’s average annual compensation for the three (3) consecutive years of employment that produced the greatest aggregate compensation; or

A separation benefit.

The annual amount of initial service retirement allowance of a member who is over age seventy (70) years on the effective date of the member’s retirement shall be a percentage of the member’s initial service retirement allowance. Such percentage shall be one hundred percent (100%) increased as determined by the board to compensate for each month that the member’s retirement is deferred beyond age seventy (70) years.

A member’s accrued retirement allowance, as otherwise provided in subsections (1), (2), (3), (4) and (5) of this section, shall not be less than the minimum accrued retirement allowance provided in this subsection. The determination of the initial service retirement allowance provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, and the application of the provisions in subsections (6) and (7) of this section, will be made after the determination of the minimum accrued retirement allowance provided in this subsection.
This subsection shall apply to members who have at least two (2) separate periods of employment covered under this chapter where each separate period of employment would otherwise be eligible for a separation benefit described in section 59-1359, Idaho Code. For purposes of this subsection, if a separation of employment occurs that does not exceed sixty (60) consecutive calendar months, then the member’s period of employment shall be considered a continuous period of employment. For purposes of this subsection, the date of last contribution is the date of final contribution for each period or periods of employment.

The member must have at least sixty (60) months of credited service at the date of last contribution;

The member’s months of credited service and average monthly salary are determined based solely on all periods of employment up to that date of last contribution, ignoring later periods of employment; and

The accrued retirement allowance computed for each period is multiplied by the bridging factor as provided in section 59-1355(3), Idaho Code, between the date of the last contribution made during that separate period of employment and the date of the member’s final contribution made during the last period of employment prior to retirement.

(b) Six dollars ($6.00) multiplied by the number of months of credited service and by the bridging factor, as provided in section 59-1355, Idaho Code, between July 1, 1974, and the first of the month following the member’s final contribution.

For each separate period of employment considered under this subsection, the member must not have received a separation benefit for that period or, if he has received such a separation benefit under section 59-1359, Idaho Code, he must have completed reinstatement of all previous credited service associated with all separation benefits for all periods of employment as permitted under section 59-1360, Idaho Code.

The minimum accrued retirement allowance shall be equal to the largest accrued retirement allowance calculated at each date of last contribution based upon the benefit and eligibility provisions in effect as of the date of the last contribution made during such separate period of employment. For purposes of determining the accrued retirement allowance for each date of last contribution:

§ 59-1343. Conversion and commutation of certain payments.

Unless the retirement board establishes a different level by rule, benefit payments of less than twenty dollars ($20.00) per month shall be commuted into an actuarially equivalent single sum.

§ 59-1344. Time for payment of service retirement or early retirement.

A service retirement allowance or early retirement allowance shall become payable to a member on the first of the month following his ceasing to be an employee while eligible for service retirement or early retirement and on the first of each month thereafter to and including the first of the month of the member’s death.

§ 59-1345. Vested member eligible for early retirement.

A vested member who is not eligible for either service retirement or disability retirement is eligible for early retirement if he is within ten (10) years of being eligible for service retirement. Additionally, a vested member is eligible for early retirement on termination of disability retirement as provided by section 59-1354(2), Idaho Code.

§ 59-1346. Computation of early retirement allowances.

The annual amount of initial early retirement allowance of a member shall be a percentage of the member’s accrued retirement allowance. Such percentage shall be one hundred percent (100%) if the sum of the number of years and months of credited service and the age in years and months is equal to or greater than the sum indicated in this subsection. Otherwise, such percentage shall be one hundred percent (100%) reduced by one-fourth of one percent (.25%) for each month up to sixty (60) months that the member’s retirement precedes the date the member would be eligible to receive full accrued benefit without additional credited service, and further reduced by two-thirds of one percent (.6667%) for each additional month. Effective October 1, 1992, the further reduction for each additional month shall equal six thousand forty-two ten-thousandths of one percent (.6042%) of the member’s average monthly salary; effective October 1, 1993, the further reduction for each additional month shall equal five thousand four hundred seventeen ten-thousandths of one percent (.5417%) of the member’s average monthly salary; and effective October 1, 1994, the further reduction for each additional month shall equal four thousand seven hundred ninety-two ten-thousandths of one percent (.4792%) of the member’s average monthly salary. Entitlement to an annual amount of accrued retirement allowance shall not vest until the effective date of that annual amount of accrued retirement allowance. The retirement benefits shall be calculated on the amounts, terms and conditions in effect at the date of the final contribution by the member.

If the majority of a member’s credited service is as an elected official or as an appointed official, including a member of the Idaho legislature who first took office after July 1, 2019, and that official was normally in the administrative offices of the employer less than twenty (20) hours per week during the term of office, or was normally not required to be present at any particular workstation for the employer twenty (20) hours per week or more during the term of office, that member’s accrued retirement allowance shall be the sum of:
(2)(a) If the majority of a member’s credited service is as an elected official or as an appointed official, including a member of the Idaho legislature who first took office after July 1, 2019, and that official was normally in the administrative offices of the employer less than twenty (20) hours per week during the term of office, or was normally not required to be present at any particular workstation for the employer twenty (20) hours per week or more during the term of office, that member’s accrued retirement allowance shall be the sum of:

That amount computed from an average monthly salary for salary received only for those months of service as an elected or as an appointed official that are in excess of the months of other credited service without consideration of any other credited service; and

That accrued retirement allowance that is computed from an average monthly salary for salary received during the member’s total months of credited service excluding those excess months referenced in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.

The initial retirement allowance of members of the Idaho legislature who first took office on or before July 1, 2019, will be computed under the provisions of this section, on the basis of their total months of credited service.

A separation benefit.

In no case will a member’s initial early retirement benefit be equal to more than the member’s accrued benefit as of May 1, 1990, or one hundred percent (100%) of the member’s average compensation for the three (3) consecutive years of employment that produce the greatest aggregate compensation, whichever is greater. If the benefit is calculated to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the member’s average compensation, the member shall be eligible for and may choose either:
(a) An annual early retirement allowance equal to the member’s average annual compensation for the three (3) consecutive years of employment that produced the greatest aggregate compensation; or

A member’s accrued retirement allowance, as otherwise provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, shall not be less than the minimum accrued retirement allowance provided in this subsection. The determination of the initial early retirement allowance provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section and the application of the provisions in subsection (3) of this section will be made after the determination of the minimum accrued retirement allowance provided in this subsection.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply to members who have at least two (2) separate periods of employment covered under this chapter where each separate period of employment would otherwise be eligible for a separation benefit described in section 59-1359, Idaho Code. For purposes of this subsection, if a separation of employment occurs that does not exceed sixty (60) consecutive calendar months, then the member’s period of employment shall be considered a continuous period of employment. For purposes of this subsection, the date of last contribution is the date of final contribution for each period of employment.

For each separate period of employment considered under this subsection, the member must not have received a separation benefit for that period or, if he has received such a separation benefit under section 59-1359, Idaho Code, he must have completed reinstatement of all previous credited service associated with all separation benefits for all periods of employment as permitted under section 59-1360, Idaho Code.

The minimum accrued retirement allowance shall be equal to the largest accrued retirement allowance calculated at each date of last contribution based upon the benefit and eligibility provisions in effect as of the date of the last contribution made during such separate period of employment. For purposes of determining the accrued retirement allowance for each date of last contribution:

The member must have at least sixty (60) months of credited service at the date of last contribution;

The member’s months of credited service and average monthly salary are determined based solely on all periods of employment up to that date of last contribution, ignoring later periods of employment; and

The accrued retirement allowance computed for each period is multiplied by the bridging factor as provided in section 59-1355(3), Idaho Code, between the date of the last contribution made during the separate period of employment and the date of the member’s final contribution made during the last period of employment prior to retirement.

0.000 to 0.050

90

0.051 to 0.150

89

0.151 to 0.250

88

0.251 to 0.350

87

0.351 to 0.450

86

0.451 to 0.550

85

0.551 to 0.650

84

0.651 to 0.750

83

0.751 to 0.850

82

0.851 to 0.950

81

0.951 to 1.000

80

§ 59-1347 — 59-1349. Inactive member eligible for vested retirement — Computation of allowance — Time for payment. [Repealed.]

§ 59-1350. Deferral of early retirement.

Early retirement may be deferred by a member until the date he would have been eligible for service retirement had he remained an active member.

§ 59-1351. Conversion of service retirement or early retirement allowances into optional retirement allowances — Form of optional retirement.

The service retirement allowance, or the early retirement allowance of a member who, at time of retirement, so elects shall be converted into an optional retirement allowance which is the actuarial equivalent of such other allowance. The optional retirement allowance may take one (1) of the forms listed below and shall be in lieu of all other benefits under this chapter except that the provisions of section 59-1361(2), Idaho Code, shall be applicable:

Option 1 provides a reduced retirement allowance payable during the lifetime of the retired member, and a continuation thereafter of such reduced retirement allowance during the lifetime of the member’s named contingent annuitant.

Option 2 provides a reduced retirement allowance payable during the lifetime of the retired member, and a continuation thereafter of one-half (1/2) of such reduced retirement allowance during the lifetime of the member’s named contingent annuitant.

Option 3, which is available only if the member retires before the date of the social security normal retirement age for that member, provides an increased retirement allowance until such date and a reduced retirement allowance thereafter, the difference between the two (2) amounts approximately equaling the governmental old-age benefit becoming payable at such date as estimated by the board.

Option 4, which is available only if the member retires before the date of the social security normal retirement age for that member, provides either an adjusted option 1 (option 4A) or option 2 (option 4B) retirement allowance until such date and a reduced retirement allowance thereafter, the difference between the two (2) amounts approximately equaling the governmental old-age benefit becoming payable at such date as estimated by the board. The adjusted retirement allowance shall be paid to the retired member during the member’s lifetime and the appropriate continuation amount of the adjusted allowance to the member’s named contingent annuitant for life thereafter.

Should the named contingent annuitant under option 1 or option 2 either predecease a member retiring on or after October 1, 1992, or waive all survivor benefits pursuant to a domestic retirement order approved under section 59-1320, Idaho Code, upon notification to the board, the member’s benefit on the first day of the month following the death of the contingent annuitant or approval of the domestic retirement order, as applicable, will thereafter become an allowance calculated pursuant to section 59-1342 or 59-1346, Idaho Code, whichever was applicable on the date of retirement, in addition to any postretirement allowance adjustments which may have accrued from that time. Should the named contingent annuitant under option 4 either predecease the member, or waive all survivor benefits pursuant to a domestic retirement order approved under section 59-1320, Idaho Code, upon notification to the board, the member’s benefit on the first day of the month following the contingent annuitant’s death or approval of the domestic retirement order, as applicable will thereafter become the option 3 allowance to which the member would have been entitled as of the date of the annuitant’s death, or approval of the domestic retirement order, as applicable. The benefit changes under this subsection shall be available only to members whose last contribution was made after June 30, 1992.

Option 1 or 2 may not be chosen if initial monthly payments would be less than that amount set forth in, or pursuant to, section 59-1343, Idaho Code.

Application for any optional retirement allowance shall be in writing, duly executed and filed with the board. Such application shall contain all information required by the board, including such proofs of age as are deemed necessary by the board.

A retirement option elected at the time of retirement as provided for in this section may not be changed except by written notice to the retirement board no later than five (5) business days after the receipt of the first retirement allowance.

Not later than one (1) year after the marriage of a retired member, the member may elect option 1, 2 or 4 to become effective ninety (90) days after the date of such election, provided the member’s spouse is named as a contingent annuitant, and either:

The member was not married at the time of the member’s retirement; or

The member earlier elected option 1, 2, 4A or 4B, having named the member’s spouse as contingent annuitant, and said spouse has died or has waived all survivor benefits as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

Should a member make an election under this subsection (6), upon notification to the board, the member’s benefit on the first day of the month following the effective date of the election will thereafter become the optional retirement allowance elected, calculated as of the date of retirement pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, in addition to any postretirement allowance adjustments that may have accrued from that time.

§ 59-1352. Eligibility for disability retirement.

An active member with five (5) years of membership service is eligible for disability retirement.

A police officer member, general member, or a paid firefighter hired on or after July 1, 1993, who is not eligible for service retirement is eligible for disability retirement if disabled, as provided in section 59-1302(12), Idaho Code, on or after the first day of employment as a result of bodily injury or disease from an occupational cause.

Only active members, and inactive members whose date of last contribution as an active member was less than one (1) year prior to the date of application, are eligible to apply for disability retirement.

§ 59-1352A. Public safety officer permanent disability benefit.

A public safety officer who is ruled by the retirement system to be permanently disabled, as provided in sections 59-1302(12) and 59-1352, Idaho Code, on or after July 1, 2009, as a result of bodily injury or disease sustained in the line of duty is eligible for a onetime permanent disability benefit in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), which shall be payable as provided in this section to the permanently disabled public safety officer.

Public safety officers who qualify and who seek the benefit under this section shall apply to the retirement board. No benefit shall be payable unless the retirement board determines that:

The permanent disability occurred in the line of duty;

The permanent disability was not caused by the intentional misconduct of the public safety officer or by the public safety officer’s intentional infliction of injury; and

The public safety officer was not voluntarily intoxicated at the time of the event causing the permanent disability.

As used in this section, “public safety officer” means an active member of the retirement system who, when injured:

Was designated as a police officer member under section 59-1303, Idaho Code;

Was a firefighter as defined in section 59-1302(16), Idaho Code; or

Was a paid firefighter as defined in section 72-1403(A), Idaho Code.

The benefit payable under this section is as follows:

Separate from and independent of any benefits payable to the public safety officer under this chapter;

Not dependent upon years of service or age of the public safety officer; and

Shall not be subject to state income taxes.

It is the intent of the legislature that this benefit shall be funded solely by public safety officers in perpetuity and not by an employer, as defined in section 59-1302(15), Idaho Code. Therefore, the costs associated with providing this benefit, as determined by the board, shall be paid solely by the public safety officers.

§ 59-1353. Computation of disability retirement allowances.

The base disability retirement allowance of any member shall be equal to an initial service retirement allowance, as defined in section 59-1342, Idaho Code, based upon the years of service which would have been credited to the member had the member continued in eligible employment until service retirement eligibility age, as defined in section 59-1341, Idaho Code. Provided, however, that the total years of credited service shall not exceed the greater of:

Thirty (30) years; or

The member’s accrued membership and prior service.

The annual amount of disability retirement allowance shall equal the excess, if any, of (a) over (b), where:

Is the base disability retirement allowance provided in subsection (1) of this section; and

Is the sum of:

Any payment or portion of a payment under the provisions of any workers’ compensation law for income benefits because of the same disability, which payment is not being offset by federal social security disability benefits; and

The service retirement allowance payable under the provisions of section 59-1342, Idaho Code, where the member is the older of either age sixty-two (62) or the respective service retirement eligibility age provided in section 59-1341, Idaho Code.

If a single payment is made under the provisions of any workers’ compensation law and such single payment is in lieu of periodic income payments, for the purposes of this section such single payment shall be converted, pursuant to regulations adopted by the board, to equal periodic payments of the same number of months for which the worker’s compensation payment is awarded.

Each adjustment in the payment of a disability retirement allowance due to a change in the amount payable under the provisions of any workers’ compensation law shall take effect on the first of the month following the month in which such change is effective.

§ 59-1354. Time for payment of disability retirement allowance.

A disability retirement allowance shall become payable to a member on the first of the month next following the later of:

The day salary, sick leave or other temporary compensation benefits terminate under any plan paid for in whole or in part by the employer of the member; or

The day five (5) months after the member becomes eligible for disability retirement.

The disability retirement allowance shall be paid monthly thereafter to, but not including, the first of the month next following the earliest of the date:

Of the retired member’s death;

That the retired member elects to receive an early or service retirement allowance;

That the retired member ceases to be disabled, provided however, that a retired member, who subsequent to becoming a disability retiree serves on any state board or commission that is statutorily required to meet once per month or less and, who is not an employee as defined in this chapter by virtue of such service, shall not be deemed to have ceased to be disabled because of such service; or

That the member waives, in writing, the member’s disability allowance.

When a disability retirement allowance ceases pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section, the early or service retirement allowance shall become payable on the first of the month following the date of the last payment of the disability retirement allowance.

Effective the date a disability retirement allowance ceases pursuant to subsections (2)(c) and (d) of this section, the member’s status shall be inactive unless the member again becomes an employee or elects either early or service retirement.

§ 59-1354A. Members receiving a disability retirement returning to work.

A retired member receiving a disability retirement allowance may return to work under the following conditions:

The retired member must notify the executive director in writing in advance of the return to work; and

The disability retirement allowance shall terminate upon such notification.

The disability retirement allowance of a retired member who returns to work under subsection (1) of this section shall resume if:

The retired member terminates his return to work within one hundred fifty (150) days from the date of the notification required in subsection (1)(a) of this section;

The retired member makes a written request to the board; and

The board determines that the member is disabled, as defined in section 59-1302(12), Idaho Code, and that the member could not successfully return to work because of the same disability on which his disability retirement was based.

In making its decision, the board may require the member to submit medical records in support of his request and may require the member to submit to a medical examination. The refusal to submit such records or to submit to such examination shall constitute proof that the member is not disabled. If the board requires a medical examination, any costs associated with such examination must be paid by the member. A disability retirement allowance that is resumed under this section shall be payable the first of the month after the board makes the determination described herein.

If a retired member receiving a disability retirement allowance who returns to work again meets the definition of employee as defined in section 59-1302(14)(A), Idaho Code, eligibility for disability retirement shall be determined in accordance with sections 59-1302(12), 59-1352 and 59-1354, Idaho Code.

For the purposes of this section, “return to work” means being engaged in any activity for which compensation is normally paid but shall not include service on any state board or commission that is statutorily required to meet once per month or less where the retired member is not an employee as defined in this chapter by virtue of such service.